Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
149A

HAWAII
PESTICIDES LAW

Part I. General Provisions

Section

149A-1 Short title

149A-2 Definitions

149A-3 Delegation of duties

149A-4 Effect of chapter on department of health

Part II. Pesticide Licensing and Sale

149A-11 Prohibited acts

149A-12 Exemptions

149A-13 Procedure for licensing pesticides

149A-13.5 Pesticide use revolving fund; pesticide
training

workshops; training fee

149A-14 Refusal, cancellation, or suspension of
the license

149A-15 Labeling requirements

149A-15.5 Pesticide information signs

149A-16 Coloration of certain pesticides

149A-17 Sales, permit, and record

149A-18 Denial, suspension, or revocation of
permit

149A-19 Determination; rules; uniformity

149A-20 Seizures; "stop-sale" and
"removal from sale" orders

149A-21 Enforcement

149A-22 Authority

149A-23 Cooperation

Part III. Pesticide Use

149A-31 Prohibited acts

149A-31.2 Pesticide use; posting online

149A-32 Repealed

149A-32.5 Cancellation or suspension of pesticide
uses

149A-33 Rules

149A-34 Denial, suspension, or revocation of
certificate

149A-35 Cooperation

149A-36 Authority to inspect

149A-37 Exemptions

149A-38 Repealed

Part IV. Violations, Warning Notice, and
Penalties

149A-41 Violations, warning notice, and penalties

Part V. Advisory Committee

149A-51 Advisory committee

Part VI. Miscellaneous Provisions

149A-52 Severability

149A-53 Applicability of chapter 91

Note

Pesticide subsidy program for coffee growers; report to
2019 legislature (repealed June 30, 2019). L 2014, c 105, §3; L 2015, c 152, §1.

Cross
References

Rules for pesticide information signs, see §149A-15.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next